District of Columbia statutes.
28-5206

Pricing.

(a)

The unit price shall be to the nearest cent when a dollar or more. If the unit price is under a dollar, it shall be listed:

(1)

To the tenth of a cent; or

(2)

To the whole cent.

(b)

The retail establishment shall have the option of listing the unit price as outlined in subsection (a)(1) or (2) of this section, but shall not use both methods of listing the unit price.

(c)

The retail establishment shall accurately and consistently use the same method of rounding up or down to compute the price to the whole cent.

History

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-282, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2132

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28-5207.